New York, session 2025-2026, A11076.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 345-e to 2 read as follows: 3 § 345-e. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Detec- 4 tive Stephen J. Mullen. All that portion of the state highway system 5 constituting the bridge on state route one hundred ten, designated as 6 bridge number 1019119, which crosses over state route twenty-seven, in 7 the town of Babylon, county of Suffolk, shall be dedicated to Detective 8 Stephen J. Mullen. 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 12 signing shall state "Bridge Dedicated to Detective Stephen J Mullen". 13 However, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of 14 commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act 15 shall be one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such bridge 16 shall not be changed as a result of this act. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15463-03-6